Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1570
Liability; when.

Nothing in section 81-1568 shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for damages resulting from his or her gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

Laws 1984, LB 420, § 4.